Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4606
Duty to notify of change of address.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted during deployment pursuant to sections 43-4608 to 43-4612 or 43-4613 to 43-4623 shall notify the deploying parent and any other individual with custodial responsibility of a child of any change of the individual's mailing address or residence until the grant is terminated. The individual shall provide the notice to any court that has issued a custody or child support order concerning the child which is in effect.

(b) If a court order currently in effect prohibits disclosure of the address or contact information of an individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted, a notification under subsection (a) of this section may be made only to the court that issued the order. The court shall keep confidential the mailing address or residence of the individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 6.